Alabama, session 2026rs, HB560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 32-9C-12 is added to Chapter 9C of
Title 32, Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
§32-9C-12
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the
contrary, the use of ADS-equipped vehicles and automated
driving systems is prohibited if the operation of the vehicle
otherwise requires a permit pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter
9, relating to the movement of oversized vehicles or loads.
Section 2. Section 32-9C-6, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§32-9C-6
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or in
Chapter 9B and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the
operation of ADS-equipped vehicles and automated driving
systems is governed exclusively by this chapter.
(b) No state or local entity may impose requirements,
including performance standards, specific to the operation of
ADS-equipped vehicles, automated driving systems, or automated
commercial motor vehicles as defined in Section 32-9B-1,
except as specifically authorized by this chapter. Nothing in
this section shall be construed to repeal or in any way modify
Section 32-9-29.
(c) No municipality or other local or state entity may
impose a tax on, or impose requirements on ADS-equipped
vehicles or automated driving systems, where the tax or other
Page 2

vehicles or automated driving systems, where the tax or other
HB560 INTRODUCED
requirement relates specifically to the operation of
ADS-equipped vehicles.
(d) Nothing in this chapter creates a legal duty or
otherwise requires the state or any county or municipality to
upgrade any part of its transportation network to accommodate
the operation of ADS-equipped vehicles or automated driving
systems."
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3